Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-178
National Guard; payrolls; certification; transmission.

Payrolls for services shall be forwarded in duplicate to the Adjutant General within ten days after such services, by brigade, regimental, and company commanders, with their certificates and oaths that the persons therein named have performed the duties and are entitled to the pay therein specified. Within ten days after the receipt of such payrolls, the Adjutant General shall, if approved by the Governor and himself, forward one of the payrolls to the Director of Administrative Services.

Laws 1909, c. 90, § 60, p. 384;

R.S.1913, § 3959;

C.S.1922, § 3357;

C.S.1929, § 55-176;

R.S.1943, § 55-185;

Laws 1969, c. 460, § 2, p. 1608;

Laws 1969, c. 459, § 76, p. 1605.